src/morphology/stems/pronouns.lexc
!! Pronouns
!! --------
!! Pronouns in Klingon language are references to things.

LEXICON Pronouns
jIH+Pron:jIH    #   ;
maH+Pron:maH    #   ;
soH+Pron:soH    #   ;
tlhIH+Pron:tlhIH    #   ;
ghaH+Pron:ghaH    #   ;
chaH+Pron:chaH    #   ;
’oH+Pron:’oH    #   ;
bIH+Pron:bIH    #   ;


! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
